Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 1

General Provisions

43-19-101. Warehouses — Persons operating.

Any person may open a warehouse for the inspection and sale of tobacco under the rules, regulations, and restrictions of this chapter.

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 65, § 2; Shan., § 3379; mod. Code 1932, § 6476; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2101.

Cross-References. Agriculture commodities promotion, title 43, ch. 29.

Contracts to raise and sell farm products, title 43, ch. 15.

Cooperative marketing associations, title 43, ch. 16.

Promotion of leadership in agricultural and home economics programs at post-secondary institutions, title 49, ch. 7, part 7.

Sale of pecans, title 43, ch. 17.

Soybean promotion, title ch. 20.

Tobacco tax, §§ 67-4-1001 — 67-4-1023.

Comparative Legislation. Tobacco:

Ga. O.C.G.A. § 10-4-100 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 248.010 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. §§ 106-452 — 106-465.

Va. Code § 3.1-297 et seq.

Collateral References. Agriculture
3.3, 3.4(3).

Commerce
37.

Warehousemen
6.

43-19-102. Proof of sufficiency of warehouse required.

Every person opening a warehouse for the inspection and sale of tobacco shall prove to the county clerk by the testimony of two (2) impartial witnesses known to the clerk to be well qualified, from knowledge and experience, that the person is the proprietor of a good and sufficient warehouse, situated so as to be exposed to no extraordinary risk from fire or flood, and furnished besides, with all the implements necessary to the accurate weighing and inspection of tobacco.

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 65, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1877, ch. 109, § 1; Shan., § 3380; Code 1932, § 6477; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2102.

43-19-103. Bond of tobacco warehouseman.

Such person shall also enter into bond, with good and sufficient security, to be approved by the county mayor, and payable to the state, in the sum of five thousand dollars ($5,000), conditioned to keep the warehouse in good condition and repair, so as effectually to protect the tobacco stored in the warehouse, that the person will not sell any tobacco that has been bought by the person or on the person's account, or purchase on such person's own account any tobacco stored in the warehouse, either directly or indirectly, and that the person will perform faithfully all the duties of warehouseman as prescribed by law.

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 65, § 4; 1889, ch. 192, § 1; Shan., § 3381; Code 1932, § 6478; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2103; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

43-19-104. Fees uncollectible upon failure to give bond — Penalty for violations.

A proprietor who fails to execute a bond shall not be entitled to collect any fees on tobacco stored in the warehouse, under a penalty of one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense, to be recovered in the name of the state, one half (½) to go to the informer.

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 65, § 4; Shan., § 3382; Code 1932, § 6479; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2104.

43-19-105. Suit on bond — Parties.

Any person aggrieved may sue on this bond for a breach thereof, in the name of the state, until the penalty is exhausted.

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 65, § 4; Shan., § 3383; Code 1932, § 6480; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2105.

43-19-106. Warehouses to be floored and kept in repair.

The proprietor shall fit up the warehouse with plank floors or skids, upon which to place the tobacco, so that the hogsheads may be at least four inches (4") from the earth.

Any proprietor who fails to keep a warehouse in good repair, or to furnish it as in this section provided, shall forfeit two hundred dollars ($200) to the state, and is also liable upon the bond to an action for damages, at the instance of any planter or owner whose tobacco is injured.

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 65, § 6; Shan., § 3384; Code 1932, § 6481; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2106.

43-19-107. Scales to be kept and tested.

The proprietor shall keep good and sufficient scales for weighing tobacco, which shall be tested at the beginning of each tobacco commerical year, and every three (3) months thereafter, by the keeper and sealer of weights for the county, and at any time when written application is made by two (2) or more planters or burghers.

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 65, § 7; Shan., § 3385; Code 1932, § 6482; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2107.

43-19-108. Breaking irons for inspection, and screws for cooperage.

The proprietor shall also keep the necessary breaking irons for the proper inspection of tobacco, and screws for the proper cooperage and return of loose tobacco to the hogshead after inspection.

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 65, § 7; Shan., § 3386; Code 1932, § 6483; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2108.

43-19-109. Attention to duty — Prompt delivery for shipment.

The proprietor or the proprietor's clerks shall be constant and prompt in their attendance at the warehouse for the reception and storage of tobacco, and promptly deliver tobacco to the planter or person entitled thereto, upon order for shipment.

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 65, § 7; Shan., § 3387; Code 1932, § 6484; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2109.

43-19-110. Private warehouses.

Nothing in this chapter shall prevent any person from establishing a private warehouse for the storage of tobacco.

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 65, § 27; Shan., § 3407; Code 1932, § 6505; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2130.

43-19-111. Tobacco commercial year.

The “tobacco commercial year” commences and ends on November 1 of each year.

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 65, § 26; 1889, ch. 192, § 7; Shan., § 3406; Code 1932, § 6504; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2129.

43-19-112. Prosecution for penalties — Duties of clerk and district attorney general — Fees.

The county clerk shall attend to all prosecutions for penalties under this chapter, for the use of the state, for which the county clerk shall receive ten percent (10%) on the sums collected and paid into the state treasury. The county clerk may, also, when necessary, call on the district attorney general to give attention to prosecutions for penalties under this chapter, for which service the district attorney general shall be allowed ten dollars ($10.00) to be taxed in the bill of costs, and when collected, shall be paid into the state treasury at the same time and in the same manner as other state revenue is by law required to be paid.

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 65, § 24; impl. am. Acts 1897, ch. 41; Shan., § 3404; Code 1932, § 6503; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2128.